Illinois, session 104th, HB4885.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 28-8 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/28-8)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-8)7    Sec. 28-8. Gambling losses recoverable. 8    (a) Any person who by gambling shall lose to any other 9person, any sum of money or thing of value, amounting to the 10sum of $5,000 $50 or more and shall pay or deliver the same or 11any part thereof, may sue for and recover the money or other 12thing of value, so lost and paid or delivered, in a civil 13action against the winner thereof, with costs, in the circuit 14court. No person who accepts from another person for 15transmission, and transmits, either in his own name or in the 16name of such other person, any order for any transaction to be 17made upon, or who executes any order given to him by another 18person, or who executes any transaction for his own account 19on, any regular board of trade or commercial, commodity or 20stock exchange, shall, under any circumstances, be deemed a 21"winner" of any moneys lost by such other person in or through 22any such transactions.23    (b) (Blank). If within 6 months, such person who under the   HB4885 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 19519 RLC 32967 b1terms of Subsection 28-8(a) is entitled to initiate action to 2recover his losses does not in fact pursue his remedy, any 3person may initiate a civil action against the winner. The 4court or the jury, as the case may be, shall determine the 5amount of the loss. After such determination, the court shall 6enter a judgment of triple the amount so determined.7    (c) Gambling losses as a result of gambling conducted on a 8video gaming terminal licensed under the Video Gaming Act are 9not recoverable under this Section. 10    (d) Losses as a result of participation in any fantasy 11contests against a fantasy contest operator, including 12single-player fantasy contests, are not recoverable under this 13Section. The provisions of this amendatory Act of the 104th 14General Assembly are declarative of existing law. 15(Source: P.A. 98-31, eff. 6-24-13.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.